Illinois, session 104th, SB3026.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Water Use Act of 1983 is amended by changing 5Sections 5 and 5.1 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 45/5)  (from Ch. 5, par. 1605)7    Sec. 5. Water Conflict Resolution. In the event that a 8land occupier or person proposes to develop a new point of 9withdrawal, and the new point is a high-capacity well, the 10land occupier or person shall notify the District before 11construction of the well begins. The District shall in turn 12notify other local units of government with water systems who 13may be impacted by the proposed withdrawal. The District shall 14then review with the assistance of the Illinois State Water 15Survey and the State Geological Survey the proposed point of 16withdrawal's effect upon other users of the water. The review 17shall be completed within 30 days of receipt of the notice. The 18findings of such reviews shall be posted on a publicly 19available website made public. 20(Source: P.A. 96-222, eff. 1-1-10.) 21    (525 ILCS 45/5.1)  (from Ch. 5, par. 1605.1)22    Sec. 5.1. Groundwater Emergency Restrictions.   SB3026- 2 -LRB104 18821 WRO 32266 b1    (a) Each District within any county in Illinois through 2which the Iroquois River flows, and each District within any 3county in Illinois with a population in excess of 10,000 4100,000 through which the Mackinaw River flows, is authorized 5to recommend to the Department of Agriculture restrictions on 6groundwater withdrawal as provided by this Section.7    A land occupier or person who possesses land which 8contains an existing point of withdrawal that is a 9high-capacity well or is proposing a new point of withdrawal 10that is a high-capacity well shall register that point of 11withdrawal with the District and shall furnish such reasonable 12data in such form as may be required by the District.13    (b) The District, with the assistance and approval of the 14Department of Agriculture, shall issue recommended guidelines 15for the construction of points of withdrawal and the type and 16setting of pumps for use in those points of withdrawal. Copies 17of the guidelines shall be made available from the District 18upon request.19    (c) Within 2 working days after receiving a written 20complaint from a land occupier or a person whose point of 21withdrawal has failed to furnish its normal supply of water, 22the District shall schedule an on-site investigation. If the 23investigation discloses (1) that the point of withdrawal fails 24to furnish its normal supply of water, (2) that the failure is 25caused by a substantial lowering of the level of groundwater 26in the area, and (3) that the point of withdrawal and its   SB3026- 3 -LRB104 18821 WRO 32266 b1equipment conform to the recommended guidelines of the 2District issued under subsection (b), the District shall may 3recommend to the Department of Agriculture that the Department 4restrict the quantity of water that a person may extract from 5any high-capacity well within the District's boundaries. The 6restriction shall be expressed in gallons of water, may apply 7to one or more points of withdrawal within the District, and 8may be broadened or narrowed as appropriate. The restrictions 9may shall be lifted or modified as soon as justified by changed 10conditions.11    (d) When a District determines that restriction of the 12withdrawal of water at a particular point within the District 13is necessary to preserve an adequate water supply for all 14residents in the District, the District shall may recommend to 15the Department of Agriculture that the Department restrict the 16quantity of water that may be extracted from any point of 17withdrawal within the District which is a high-capacity well. 18The Department shall review the District's recommendation and 19if it agrees with such recommendation shall restrict the 20withdrawal of water within the District in accordance with 21subsection (c) and shall notify each land occupier or person 22who possesses land which contains a registered point of 23withdrawal affected by the restriction.24    If the Department disagrees with the District's 25recommendation, it shall notify the District, the land 26occupier or the person who possesses land which contains a   SB3026- 4 -LRB104 18821 WRO 32266 b1registered point of withdrawal affected by the recommendation 2and the complainant, giving the reason for the failure to 3affirm the recommendation. The Department shall may propose an 4alternate recommendation.5    If the District, the respondent or the complainant 6disagrees with the decision of the Department, such person may 7request an administrative hearing to be conducted by the 8Department in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 9Procedure Act to show cause concerning its decision.10    Final decisions of the Department pursuant to this Section 11may be appealed in accordance with the Administrative Review 12Law.13    (e) The Department is authorized to promulgate rules and 14regulations, including emergency rules, for the implementation 15of this amendatory Act of 1987. The Department may set the 16general policy for the Districts to follow in the 17administration of this Act.18(Source: P.A. 96-222, eff. 1-1-10.)